Washington statutes.
RCW 18.53.170

Discrimination prohibited—Acceptance of services by state agencies and subdivisions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the state and its political subdivisions shall accept the services of licensed optometrists for any service covered by their licenses with relation to any person receiving benefits, salaries, wages, or any other type of compensation from the state, its agencies or subdivisions.

[ 1973 c 48 s 2.]